Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Chapter 3. Husband and Wife

§ 93-3-1.
Disability of coverture abolished; cause of action for loss of consortium of husband.

Married women are fully emancipated from all disability on account of coverture; and the common law as to the disabilities of married women and its effect on the rights of property of the wife, is totally abrogated, and marriage shall not impose any disability or incapacity on a woman as to the ownership, acquisition, or disposition of property of any sort, or as to her capacity to make contracts and do all acts in reference to property which she could lawfully do if she were not married. Every woman not married, or hereafter to be married shall have the same capacity to acquire, hold, manage, control, use, enjoy and dispose of all property, real and personal, in possession or expectancy, and to make any contract in reference to it, and to bind herself personally, and to sue and be sued, with all the rights and liabilities incident thereto, as if she were not married. A married woman shall have a cause of action for loss of consortium through negligent injury of her husband.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1167; 1892, § 2289; 1906, § 2517; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2051; 1930, § 1940; 1942, § 451; Laws, 1968, ch. 304, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 27, 1968).

§ 93-3-3.
May sue each other.

Husband and wife may sue each other.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1168; 1892, § 2290; 1906, § 2518; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2052; 1930, § 1941; 1942, § 452.

§ 93-3-5.
Dower and curtesy abolished.

Dower and curtesy, as heretofore known, are abolished.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1170; 1892, § 2291; 1906, § 2519; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2053; 1930, § 1942; 1942, § 453.

§ 93-3-7.
Restrictions on contracts between husband and wife.

Husband and wife shall not contract with each other, so as to entitle the one to claim or receive any compensation from the other for work and labor, and any contract between them whereby one shall claim or shall receive compensation from the other for services rendered, shall be void. It shall not be lawful for the husband to rent the wife’s plantation, houses, horses, mules, wagons, carts, or other implements, and with them, or with any of her means, to operate and carry on business in his own name or on his own account, but all business done with the means of the wife by the husband shall be deemed and held to be on her account and for her use, and by the husband as her agent and manager in business, as to all persons dealing with him without notice, unless the contract between the husband and wife which changes this relation, be evidenced by writing, subscribed by them, duly acknowledged, and filed with the chancery clerk of the county where such business may be done, to be recorded as other instruments.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1177; 1892, § 2293; 1906, § 2521; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2055; 1930, § 1943; 1942, § 454.

§ 93-3-9.
Validity of conveyance or lease between spouses.

A transfer or conveyance of goods and chattels, or lands, or any lease of lands, between husband and wife, shall not be valid as against any third person, unless the transfer or conveyance be in writing and acknowledged and filed for record as a mortgage or deed of trust is required to be. Possession of the property shall not be equivalent to filing the writing for record, but, to affect third persons, the writing must be filed for record.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1178; 1892, § 2294; 1906, § 2522; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2056; 1930, § 1944; 1942, § 455; Laws, 1900, ch. 90.

§ 93-3-11.
Removal of disabilities of minority of certain married persons with respect to homestead transactions; presumption of occupancy.

The disabilities of minority of any married minor having attained the age of eighteen (18) are hereby removed solely for the purpose of executing, signing, or acknowledging contracts of purchase or sale, deeds, promissory notes, deeds of trust or mortgages, other negotiable or nonnegotiable instruments, assignments, or other transfers, homestead declarations, or homestead exemption applications, or other legal documents pertaining solely to the property occupied or to be occupied as the actual place of residence of such married minors. To assure validity and enforceability according to their terms of any legal documents executed by such married minors pursuant to this section, occupancy of, or intention to occupy, property as the place of residence of such married minors shall be conclusively presumed from the execution by them of such documents. The removal of disabilities provided under this section shall be supplemental and cumulative of other laws, but shall not be construed so as to apply to any transaction other than transactions pertaining to the residences or intended residences of such minors.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 455.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 277, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 305, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved August 7, 1968).

§ 93-3-13.
Liability of husband for property or income of wife.

If the husband receive and appropriate to his own use the property of his wife, or the income and profit of her property, he shall be debtor to his wife therefor; but neither he nor his representatives shall be accountable to his wife for the income or profits of her estate, after the expiration of one year from the receipt of such income or profits. If the husband be permitted by the wife to employ the income or profits of her estate, or to use her estate in the support and maintenance of the family, he shall not be chargeable therewith nor be liable to account therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1176; 1892, § 2292; 1906, § 2520; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2054; 1930, § 1945; 1942, § 456.